District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.11

Reinsurance.

An SPFC contract which complies with this subchapter shall be granted credit for reinsurance treatment or otherwise qualifies as an asset or a reduction from liability for reinsurance ceded by a domestic insurer to an SPFC as an assuming insurer pursuant to § 31-502, for the benefit of the counterparty; provided, that:

(1)

Credit shall be granted only to the extent of the fair value of the assets held in trust for, or irrevocable letters of credit issued by a bank chartered by the District or a member bank of the Federal Reserve System or as approved by the Commissioner, for the benefit of the counterparty under the SPFC contract;

(2)

The assets are held in trust pursuant to this subchapter;

(3)

The assets are administered in the manner and pursuant to arrangements as provided in this subchapter; and

(4)

The assets are held or invested in one or more of the forms allowed by § 31-3932.07.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 211
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3932.07.